Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF421.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2581XS (1) 91 cm/jh S.F. 421 Section 1. Section 562A.6, subsection 10, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 10. âRentâ means a payment to be made to the landlord under 3 the rental agreement , including base rent, utilities, late 4 fees, and other payments made by the tenant to the landlord 5 under the rental agreement . 6 Sec. 2. Section 562A.8, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 2. Notice served by mail under this section is deemed 9 completed four days after the notice is deposited in the mail 10 and postmarked for delivery, whether or not the recipient signs 11 a receipt for the notice. In computing the time for completion 12 of service, the first day shall be excluded and the final day 13 shall be included regardless of whether the fourth day is a 14 Saturday, Sunday, or federal holiday. 15 Sec. 3. Section 562A.11, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 3. A provision prohibited by this section included in a 18 rental agreement is unenforceable. If a landlord willfully 19 uses enforces a provision in a rental agreement containing 20 provisions known by the landlord to be prohibited, a tenant may 21 recover actual damages sustained by the tenant and not more 22 than three monthsâ periodic rent and reasonable attorney fees. 23 Sec. 4. Section 562A.29A, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 24 2025, is amended to read as follows: 25 c. Posting on the primary entrance door of the dwelling 26 unit and mailing by both regular mail and certified mail, as 27 defined in section 618.15 , to the address of the dwelling 28 unit or to the tenantâs last known address, if different from 29 the address of the dwelling unit. A notice posted according 30 to this paragraph shall be posted within the applicable time 31 period for serving notice and shall include the date the notice 32 was posted. A notice delivered under this paragraph that is 33 addressed to all tenants and unknown parties in possession 34 shall be deemed to provide notice to all tenants, occupants, 35 -1- LSB 2581XS (1) 91 cm/jh 1/ 9 S.F. 421 and parties in possession of the premises. 1 Sec. 5. Section 562B.9, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 2 to read as follows: 3 2. Notice served by mail under this section is deemed 4 completed four days after the notice is deposited in the mail 5 and postmarked for delivery, whether or not the recipient signs 6 a receipt for the notice. In computing the time for completion 7 of service, the first day shall be excluded and the final day 8 shall be included regardless of whether the fourth day is a 9 Saturday, Sunday, or federal holiday. 10 Sec. 6. Section 562B.11, subsection 3, Code 2025, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 3. A provision prohibited by this section included in a 13 rental agreement is unenforceable. If a landlord or tenant 14 knowingly uses enforces a provision in a rental agreement 15 containing provisions known to be prohibited by this chapter , 16 the other party may recover actual damages sustained. 17 Sec. 7. Section 562B.27A, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 18 2025, is amended to read as follows: 19 c. Posting on the primary entrance door of the dwelling 20 unit and mailing by both regular mail and certified mail, as 21 defined in section 618.15 , to the address of the dwelling 22 unit or to the tenantâs last known address, if different from 23 the address of the dwelling unit. A notice posted according 24 to this paragraph shall be posted within the applicable time 25 period for serving notice and shall include the date the notice 26 was posted. A notice delivered under this paragraph that is 27 addressed to all tenants and unknown parties in possession 28 shall be deemed to provide notice to all tenants, occupants, 29 and parties in possession of the premises. 30 Sec. 8. Section 648.3, subsection 2, paragraphs a and c, 31 Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 32 a. Delivery evidenced by an acknowledgment of delivery that 33 is signed and dated by a resident of the premises who is at 34 least eighteen years of age. Delivery A notice delivered under 35 -2- LSB 2581XS (1) 91 cm/jh 2/ 9 S.F. 421 this paragraph that is addressed to all tenants and unknown 1 parties in possession shall be deemed to provide notice to the 2 defendant all tenants, occupants, and parties in possession of 3 the premises . 4 c. Posting on the primary entrance door of the premises and 5 mailing by both regular mail and certified mail, as defined 6 in section 618.15 , to the address of the premises or to the 7 defendantâs last known address, if different from the address 8 of the premises. A notice posted according to this paragraph 9 shall be posted within the applicable time period for serving 10 notice and shall include the date the notice was posted. A 11 notice delivered under this paragraph that is addressed to 12 all tenants and unknown parties in possession shall be deemed 13 to provide notice to all tenants, occupants, and parties in 14 possession of the premises. 15 Sec. 9. Section 648.5, subsection 2, paragraph c, Code 2025, 16 is amended to read as follows: 17 c. If service cannot be made following two attempts using 18 a method specified under paragraph âaâ or âbâ , by posting on 19 the primary entrance door of the premises and mailing by both 20 regular mail and certified mail, as defined in section 618.15 , 21 to the address of the premises or to the defendantâs last known 22 address, if different from the address of the premises. An 23 original notice posted according to this paragraph shall be 24 posted not less than three days prior to the hearing and shall 25 include the date the original notice was posted. Service of 26 original notice by mailing shall occur not less than three days 27 prior to the hearing , but may otherwise occur prior to the two 28 attempts using a method specified under paragraph âaâ or âbâ . 29 Sec. 10. Section 648.18, Code 2025, is amended to read as 30 follows: 31 648.18 Possession ââ bar. 32 Thirty Ninety daysâ peaceable possession with the knowledge 33 of the plaintiff after the cause of action accrues is a bar to 34 this proceeding. 35 -3- LSB 2581XS (1) 91 cm/jh 3/ 9 S.F. 421 Sec. 11. Section 648.22, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 648.22 Judgment ââ execution ââ costs ââ sealing of court 3 records . 4 1. If the defendant is found guilty, judgment shall be 5 entered that the defendant be removed from the premises, and 6 that the plaintiff be put in possession of the premises, and an 7 execution for the defendantâs removal within three days from 8 the judgment shall issue accordingly, to which judgment for 9 costs shall be entered in the judgment docket and lien index, 10 and to which shall be added a clause commanding the officer to 11 collect the costs as in ordinary cases. 12 2. In a residential forcible entry and detainer action, 13 the court records of the action shall be sealed not later than 14 three days from the date of the order, if any of the following 15 occurs: 16 a. The defendant is found not guilty. 17 b. The case is dismissed. 18 c. The plaintiff does not appear for the hearing. 19 3. In a residential forcible entry and detainer action, the 20 court shall enter an order sealing the court records of the 21 action not later than three days from the date of the order 22 if, by motion or upon the courtâs own determination, the court 23 finds there is no genuine issue of material fact between the 24 parties. 25 4. Upon application of a defendant found guilty in a 26 residential forcible entry and detainer action for nonpayment 27 of rent, the court shall enter an order sealing the record of 28 the action, the existence of the petition, all filings and 29 documentation within the case file, and any associated writs of 30 execution, if all of the following conditions are met: 31 a. More than seven years have passed since the date of the 32 finding of guilt. 33 b. The applicant has not been found guilty in a subsequent 34 forcible entry and detainer action in the five-year period 35 -4- LSB 2581XS (1) 91 cm/jh 4/ 9 S.F. 421 directly preceding the application. 1 c. The applicant has not previously been granted a sealing 2 of a finding of guilt under this chapter within ten years prior 3 to the application. 4 d. The applicant has paid all court costs, fees, fines, and 5 any other financial obligation ordered by the court or assessed 6 by the clerk of the district court in the case. 7 5. The application to seal the record of the action shall be 8 included in the record the defendant wishes to seal, using a 9 form prescribed by the supreme court. 10 6. In a residential forcible entry and detainer action for 11 nonpayment of rent in which the defendant is found guilty, the 12 court shall enter an order sealing the record of the action, 13 the existence of the petition, all filings and documentation 14 within the case file, and any associated writs of execution, if 15 all of the following conditions are met: 16 a. The application is filed jointly by the plaintiff and 17 defendant. 18 b. The defendant applicant has paid all court costs, fees, 19 fines, and any other financial obligation ordered by the court 20 or assessed by the clerk of the district court in the case. 21 7. Upon sealing, the existence of the petition, all filings 22 and documentation within the case file, and any associated 23 writs of execution shall be removed from any publicly 24 accessible location under the direction of the judicial branch 25 or county, as applicable. The clerk of court shall enter 26 satisfaction of judgment in the judgment docket and lien index. 27 Notwithstanding chapter 22, records sealed upon satisfaction 28 of the requirements specified in this section shall not be 29 available for public inspection except in one of the following 30 manners: 31 a. Upon request by the defendant or the attorney for the 32 defendant by filing a motion in the sealed case. 33 b. Upon application to the judicial branch using a form 34 prescribed by the supreme court for scholarly, educational, 35 -5- LSB 2581XS (1) 91 cm/jh 5/ 9 S.F. 421 journalistic, or governmental purposes only, provided that in 1 all cases, the names of minor children shall remain sealed 2 at all times, and that the names and personally identifiable 3 information of all persons named as defendants or included in 4 the plaintiffâs petition shall be redacted and remain sealed 5 unless the court determines that release of such information is 6 necessary to fulfill the scholarly, educational, journalistic, 7 or governmental purpose of the request. 8 c. State court administration shall maintain a record in 9 the aggregate of all filings and the final disposition of any 10 such actions, to include dismissal, default judgment, and writs 11 associated with disposition. State court administration shall 12 make available to the public and report annually such aggregate 13 information in such a manner prescribed by the supreme court as 14 to protect the identity of the parties while still providing 15 the public with information regarding eviction proceedings. 16 8. Subsections 4 through 7 do not apply to a money judgment 17 awarded for an action that was filed with a forcible entry 18 and detainer action or arising from the same set of facts and 19 circumstances. 20 9. Subsections 3 through 5 do not create an independent 21 cause of action by a tenant for use of lawfully obtained 22 information. 23 Sec. 12. NEW SECTION . 648.22C Removal of personal property. 24 Any personal property of the defendant remaining on the 25 premises after the defendantâs removal under section 648.22 may 26 be immediately disposed of by the plaintiff. Personal property 27 under this section does not include a mobile home as defined in 28 section 562B.7, or the contents therein, unless the mobile home 29 is the premises. 30 Sec. 13. EFFECTIVE DATE. The following takes effect July 31 1, 2026: 32 The section of this Act amending section 648.22. 33